Vermont, session 2025-2026, S275.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 5302 is amended to read:
§ 5302. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter and unless otherwise required by the context:
(1) “Agencies” means town cemeteries; religious or ecclesiastical
society cemeteries; cemetery associations; and any person, firm, corporation,
or unincorporated association engaged in the business of a cemetery.
* * *
(13) “Niche” means a recess in a columbarium used, or intended to be
used, for the permanent disposition of human remains of one or more deceased
persons.
VT LEG #382720 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.275
2026 Page 2 of 6
(14) “Qualifying damage” means damage caused by acts of vandalism
that cannot be repaired by means of regular maintenance.
(15) “Regular maintenance” means regular upkeep, including mowing
and tree removal.
(16) “Temporary receiving vault” means a vault or crypt in a structure
of durable and lasting construction used, or intended to be used, for the
temporary deposit of the remains of a deceased person for a period of time not
exceeding one year.
(17) “Vandalism” means the willful or malicious destruction or
defacement of property in a cemetery, such as the toppling of memorial stones
and damage to crypts, niches, grave sites, monuments, or memorials.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 5324 is added to read:
§ 5324. CEMETERY VANDALISM RESPONSE GRANTS
(a) The Vermont Old Cemetery Association (VOCA) shall provide grants
to an agency to repair vandalized cemeteries.
(b) Within 30 days after the discovery of an act of vandalism, as defined in
section 5302 of this title, an agency shall:
(1) Report the act to VOCA either verbally or in writing.
(2) Provide written notice to the lot owner or next of kin if damage was
done to a crypt, niche, grave site, monument, or memorial. The notice shall
advise the lot owner or next of kin to seek insurance benefits that may be
VT LEG #382720 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.275
2026 Page 3 of 6
available pursuant to a homeowner’s insurance policy. A copy of the notice
shall be maintained by the agency.
(c) Within six months after reporting an act of vandalism, the agency may
apply to VOCA for a grant to repair the qualifying damage.
(1) The grant application shall include the following:
(A) a description of the qualifying damage, photographs of the
qualifying damage, and the date that the report of vandalism was filed with
VOCA;
(B) a copy of any letters, newspaper advertisements, or other
documented attempts to obtain funding for the repair from the family of the
deceased;
(C) a copy of other reports relating to the act of vandalism filed in
accordance with law;
(D) a copy of bids submitted by at least two contractors for the cost
of repairs; and
(E) a statement signed by the cemetery commissioner or other proper
officer that the agency has no available funds that it is authorized to use for the
purpose of repair; that it has not been able to obtain sufficient funds from the
family of the deceased, including insurance benefits; and that the proposed
costs of the repairs are fair and reasonable.
VT LEG #382720 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.275
2026 Page 4 of 6
(2) A VOCA representative shall review the qualifying damage within
90 days after receipt of a complete grant application and make a determination
based on the following factors:
(A) whether there is qualifying damage;
(B) severity of the qualifying damage;
(C) whether the vandalism is part of a wave of vandalism;
(D) emotional distress to visiting families;
(E) appropriateness of prior use of payments from the Cemetery
Vandalism Response Fund;
(F) priority of application based upon previous allocations; and
(G) availability of monies within the Cemetery Vandalism Response
Fund.
(3) Upon approval, the VOCA treasurer shall disburse funds directly to
the appropriate cemetery commissioner or other proper officer. The agency
shall apply all disbursements made by VOCA to the repair of the vandalized
property described in the vandalism grant application. Any funds remaining
after the repairs have been performed must be returned to VOCA for redeposit
to the Cemetery Vandalism Response Fund.
(4) Within 90 days after receipt of disbursements, the agency shall make
a final report to VOCA. The final report shall include the repairs made and by
whom, the amount of funds expended, and the amount of funds to be returned
VT LEG #382720 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.275
2026 Page 5 of 6
to VOCA, if any. If the repairs have not been completed, the reason shall be
explained, and the anticipated date for a subsequent, final report shall be
provided. The report and any additional report shall be sworn by a cemetery
commissioner or other proper officer.
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 5325 is added to read:
§ 5325. CEMETERY VANDALISM RESPONSE FUND
(a) Creation. The Cemetery Vandalism Response Fund is established to
provide grants to agencies to repair vandalized cemeteries. The Fund shall be
administered by the Vermont Old Cemetery Association (VOCA). Monies in
the Fund shall be used solely to provide cemetery vandalism response grants
pursuant to section 5324 of this title.
(b) Fees and Collection.
(1) Every agency shall contribute $5.00 to the Cemetery Vandalism
Response Fund for each burial or cremation it performs. A contribution shall
not be collected upon the burial of the remains of a deceased person where a
contribution was collected upon cremation.
(2) On or before January 15 of each year, every agency that has
performed a burial or cremation during the preceding calendar year shall
submit a check to VOCA for the total amount collected during the preceding
year toward payment to the Fund. Payment shall be accompanied by a
statement signed by a cemetery commissioner or other proper officer certifying
VT LEG #382720 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.275
2026 Page 6 of 6
the number of burials and cremations and the amount transmitted. Funds will
be disbursed to VOCA on January 31 of each year.
Sec. 4. CEMETERY VANDALISM RESPONSE FUND; INITIAL FEE
COLLECTION
The Vermont Old Cemetery Association shall collect initial fees for the
Cemetery Vandalism Response Fund beginning on January 1, 2027, for each
burial or cremation occurring between July 1, 2026, and December 31, 2026.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #382720 v.2